Hawaii, session 2025, SB217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 264, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part    .  TOLL ROADS AND TOLL CHARGES §264-A  Toll roads; toll charges; designation of existing state highways.  (a)  The director of transportation may: (1)  Designate as a toll road any existing state highway or any portion thereof; and (2)  Impose toll charges for the use of any toll road designated pursuant to this section. (b) The department of transportation shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the purpose of this section. §264-B  Toll road; toll charges; Hana highway.  The director of transportation shall designate as a toll road, and impose toll charges for the use of, the portion of Hana highway from mile marker thirty-two to mile marker forty." SECTION 2.  The department of transportation shall develop a plan to exempt from the imposition of any toll charged pursuant to section 264-B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, vehicle operators who are residents of the State; provided that, in developing the plan, the department of transportation shall ensure that the proposed exemption does not interfere with the maintenance and use of the subject toll road.  The department of transportation shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3. In codifying the new sections added by section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________